src/wip/ukrainian.sbl
/**
 * WIP
 *
 * https://github.com/snowballstem/snowball/pull/178
 */

stringescapes {}

/* the 33 Ukrainian letters and apostrophe represented by single quote */

stringdef a    '{U+0430}'
stringdef b    '{U+0431}'
stringdef v    '{U+0432}'
stringdef gh   '{U+0433}'
stringdef g    '{U+0491}'
stringdef d    '{U+0434}'
stringdef e    '{U+0435}'
stringdef ye   '{U+0454}'
stringdef zh   '{U+0436}'
stringdef z    '{U+0437}'
stringdef y    '{U+0438}'
stringdef i    '{U+0456}'
stringdef yi   '{U+0457}'
stringdef i`   '{U+0439}'
stringdef k    '{U+043A}'
stringdef l    '{U+043B}'
stringdef m    '{U+043C}'
stringdef n    '{U+043D}'
stringdef o    '{U+043E}'
stringdef p    '{U+043F}'
stringdef r    '{U+0440}'
stringdef s    '{U+0441}'
stringdef t    '{U+0442}'
stringdef u    '{U+0443}'
stringdef f    '{U+0444}'
stringdef kh   '{U+0445}'
stringdef ts   '{U+0446}'
stringdef ch   '{U+0447}'
stringdef sh   '{U+0448}'
stringdef shch '{U+0449}'
stringdef soft '{U+044C}'
stringdef iu   '{U+044E}'
stringdef ia   '{U+044F}'

// Apostrophe-like symbols
// stringdef a_apostrophe      '{U+0027}' // '
// stringdef a_grave_accent   U+0060   // ` cannot to remove system char in Snowball
stringdef a_ml_prime        '{U+02B9}' // {a_ml_prime}
stringdef a_mlt_comma       '{U+02BB}' // {a_mlt_comma}
stringdef a_ml_apostrophe   '{U+02BC}' // {a_ml_apostrophe}
stringdef a_mlr_comma       '{U+02BD}' // {a_mlr_comma}
stringdef a_mlv_line        '{U+02C8}' // {a_mlv_line}
stringdef a_lsq_mark        '{U+2018}' // {a_lsq_mark}
stringdef a_rsq_mark        '{U+2019}' // {a_rsq_mark}
stringdef a_shr9q_mark      '{U+201B}' // {a_shr9q_mark}
stringdef a_prime           '{U+2032}' // {a_prime}

routines (
  prelude
  mark_regions R1 R2
  perfective_gerund
  adjective
  adjectival
  reflexive
  verb
  noun
  common_avn
  derivational
  // tidy_up
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v )

define v '{a}{e}{ye}{y}{i}{yi}{o}{u}{iu}{ia}'

define prelude as (
  do repeat ( goto (['{g}']) <- '{gh}' )

  // Remove any apostrophe-like symbols
  do repeat ( goto (['{'}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_ml_prime}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_mlt_comma}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_ml_apostrophe}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_mlr_comma}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_mlv_line}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_lsq_mark}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_rsq_mark}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_shr9q_mark}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['{a_prime}']) delete )
)

define mark_regions as (
  $pV = limit
  $p1 = limit
  $p2 = limit
  do (
    gopast v  setmark pV  gopast non-v setmark p1
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
  )
)

backwardmode (
  define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
  define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

  define perfective_gerund as (
    [substring] among (
      '{v}'      // {d}{o}{n}{a}{p}{y}{s}{a}|{v}    {d}{o}{r}{o}{b}{y}|{v} {d}{o}{r}{o}{b}{y}|{v}
      '{v}{sh}{y}'    // {n}{a}{p}{y}{s}{a}|{v}{sh}{y}    {z}{r}{o}{b}{y}|{v}{sh}{y}
      '{v}{sh}{y}{s}{soft}'  // {o}{b}{e}{r}{i}{gh}{a}|{v}{sh}{y}{s}{soft} {s}{p}{a}{k}{u}{v}{a}|{v}{sh}{y}{s}{soft}
      '{v}{sh}{y}{s}{ia}'  // {o}{b}{e}{r}{i}{gh}{a}|{v}{sh}{y}{s}{ia} {s}{p}{o}{d}{i}{v}{a}|{v}{sh}{y}{s}{ia}
               // ('{a}' or '{ia}' delete) ???
      '{u}{ch}{y}'    // {p}{y}{sh}|{u}{ch}{y}       {r}{e}{v}|{u}{ch}{y}
      '{iu}{ch}{y}'    // {s}{ia}|{iu}{ch}{y}        {p}{i}{d}{p}{y}{s}{u}|{iu}{ch}{y}
      '{iu}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}'  // {z}{m}{a}{gh}{a}|{iu}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}
      '{iu}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}'  // {n}{a}{v}{ch}{a}|{iu}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}
      '{a}{ch}{y}'    // {b}{a}{ch}|{a}{ch}{y}
      '{a}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}'  // {b}{a}{ch}|{a}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}
      '{a}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}'  // {b}{a}{ch}|{a}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}
      '{l}{ia}{ch}{y}'   // {r}{o}{b}|{l}{ia}{ch}{y}      {l}{iu}{b}|{l}{ia}{ch}{y}
      '{l}{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}' // {b}{a}{v}|{l}{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}
      '{l}{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}' // {b}{a}{v}|{l}{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}
      '{ia}{ch}{y}'    // {s}{y}{d}|{ia}{ch}{y}       {v}{o}{v}{t}{u}{z}|{ia}{ch}{y}
      '{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{soft}'  // ???
      '{ia}{ch}{y}{s}{ia}'  // ???
        (delete)
   )
  )

  define adjective as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{i`}' '{o}{gh}{o}' '{o}{m}{u}' '{y}{m}' '{i}{m}'
      '{i}{sh}{y}{i`}' '{i}{sh}{o}{gh}{o}' '{i}{sh}{o}{m}{u}' '{i}{sh}{y}{m}' '{i}{sh}{i}{m}' '{i}{sh}{e}'
      '{o}{yi}' '{i}{i`}' '{o}{iu}'
      '{i}{sh}{a}' '{i}{sh}{o}{yi}' '{i}{sh}{i}{i`}' '{i}{sh}{u}' '{i}{sh}{o}{iu}'
      '{y}{kh}' '{y}{m}{y}'
      '{i}{sh}{i}' '{i}{sh}{y}{kh}' '{i}{sh}{y}{m}{y}'
      '{soft}{o}{gh}{o}' '{soft}{o}{m}{u}'
      '{soft}{o}{yi}' '{soft}{o}{iu}'
      '{i}{kh}' '{i}{m}{y}'

      '{ia}{ch}{a}' '{ia}{ch}{e}' '{ia}{ch}{u}' '{ia}{ch}{i}'
      '{a}{ch}{a}' '{a}{ch}{e}' '{a}{ch}{u}' '{a}{ch}{i}'
      '{iu}{ch}{a}' '{iu}{ch}{e}' '{iu}{ch}{u}' '{iu}{ch}{i}'
      '{u}{ch}{a}' '{u}{ch}{e}' '{u}{ch}{u}' '{u}{ch}{i}'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define adjectival as (
    adjective

    try (
      [substring] among (
        '{ia}{ch}'
        '{a}{ch}'
        '{iu}{ch}'
        '{u}{ch}'
          (delete)

        // Need or needn't ?
        // '{e}{n}' // {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{y}{i`}  {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{o}{gh}{o}   {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{o}{m}{u}   {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{y}{m}    {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{i}{m}
                // {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{a}   {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{e}     {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{o}{yi}    {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{i}{i`}    {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{u}   {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{o}{iu}
                // {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{i}   {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{y}{kh}    {v}{t}{r}{a}{ch}|{e}{n}{y}{m}{y}
      )
    )
  )

  define reflexive as (
    [substring] among (
      '{s}{ia}'    // {o}{s}{i}{k}|{s}{ia}
      '{s}{soft}'    // {n}{e}{d}{o}{n}{a}{v}{ch}{y}|{s}{soft}
      '{ye}{t}{soft}{s}{ia}' // {s}{m}{i}|{ye}{t}{soft}{s}{ia}
      '{e}{t}{soft}{s}{ia}' // {s}{p}{y}{sh}|{e}{t}{soft}{s}{ia}
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define verb as (
    [substring] among (
      '{t}{y}'
      // '{t}{soft}'  // {r}{o}{b}{y}|{t}{soft} ???
      '{i}{t}{soft}'
      '{t}{e}'

      '{i`}{t}{e}'
      '{l}{a}' '{l}{o}' '{l}{y}'
      '{ye}{sh}' '{ye}{m}{o}' '{ye}{t}{e}' '{iu}{t}{soft}'
      '{e}{sh}' '{e}{m}{o}' '{e}{t}{e}' '{u}{t}{soft}'
      '{l}{iu}' '{y}{sh}' '{y}{t}{soft}' '{y}{m}{o}' '{y}{t}{e}' '{l}{ia}{t}{soft}'
      '{yi}{sh}' '{yi}{t}{soft}' '{yi}{m}{o}' '{yi}{t}{e}' '{ia}{t}{soft}'
      '{a}{t}{soft}'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define noun as (
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{m}' '{a}{m}{y}' '{a}{kh}'
      '{e}{iu}'
      '{ia}{m}' '{ia}{m}{y}' '{ia}{kh}'
      '{o}{v}{i}' '{o}{m}'
      '{e}{ts}{soft}' '{e}{m}'
      '{e}{n}{soft}'
      '{o}{i`}'
      '{i}{iu}' '{i}{yi}'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define common_avn as (
    [substring] among (
      // adj
      // {z}{e}{l}{e}{n}|{a}  {z}{e}{l}{e}{n}|{e}   {z}{e}{l}{e}{n}|{i}   {z}{e}{l}{e}{n}|{u}  {v}{e}{r}{kh}{n}|{iu}  {v}{e}{r}{kh}{n}|{ia}

      // verb
      // {p}{y}{s}{a}|{v}   {p}{y}{sh}|{e}     {ch}{y}{t}{a}|{ye}    {ch}{y}{t}{a}|{i`}   {p}{y}{sh}|{u}    {ch}{y}{t}{a}|{iu}

      // noun
      // {v}{o}{d}|{a}    {p}{i}{s}{n}|{e}    {v}{o}{d}|{y}     {v}{o}{d}|{i}    {s}{a}{r}{a}|{i`}
      // {v}{o}{d}|{o}    {v}{o}{d}|{u}     {s}{o}{v}{i}{s}{t}|{soft}  {p}{i}{s}{n}|{iu}   {p}{i}{s}{n}|{ia}
      // {gh}{e}{n}|{i}{i`}   {v}{o}{d}|{o}{iu}

      '{a}' '{v}' '{e}' '{ye}' '{y}' '{i}'
      '{i`}' '{o}' '{u}' '{soft}' '{iu}' '{ia}'
      '{i}{i`}' '{o}{iu}'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define derivational as (
    [substring] R2 among (
      '{i}{s}{t}'  // {b}{e}{z}{t}{u}{r}{b}{o}{t}{n}|{i}{s}{t}.{iu}
      '{o}{s}{t}'  // {b}{e}{z}{t}{u}{r}{b}{o}{t}{n}|{o}{s}{t}.{i}
        (delete)
    )
  )

  // define tidy_up as (
  //     [substring] among (
  //         // '{e}{i`}{sh}'
  //         // '{e}{i`}{sh}{e}'  // superlative forms
  //         //    (delete
  //         //     ['{n}'] '{n}' delete
  //         //    )
  //         // '{n}'
  //         //    ('{n}' delete) // e.g. -nno endings
  //         // '{'}'
  //         //    (delete)  // with some slight false conflations
  //     )
  // )
)

define stem as (
  // Normalise {e"} to {e}.  The documentation has long suggested the user
  // should do this before calling the stemmer - we now do it for them.
  // do repeat ( goto (['{e"}']) <- '{e}' )

  do prelude
  do mark_regions

  backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
    do (
      perfective_gerund or
      (
        try reflexive

        adjectival or verb or noun or common_avn
      )
    )

    do derivational
    // do tidy_up
  )
)
